California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) No network company or agent shall take, receive, or retain any gratuity or a part thereof that is paid, given to, or left for an app-based driver by a customer or deduct any amount from the earnings due to an app-based driver for a ride or delivery on account of a gratuity paid in connection with the ride or delivery. A network company that permits customers to pay gratuities by credit card shall pay the app-based driver the full amount of the gratuity that the customer indicated on the credit card receipt, without any deductions for any credit card payment processing fees or costs that may be charged to the network company by the credit card company.

(d) For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions
 apply:

(1) “Applicable minimum wage” means the state mandated minimum wage for all industries or, if a passenger or item is picked up within the boundaries of a local government that has a higher minimum wage that is generally applicable to all industries, the local minimum wage of that local government. The applicable minimum wage shall be determined at the location where a passenger or item is picked up and shall apply for all engaged time spent completing that rideshare request or delivery request.

(2) “Earnings period” means a pay period, set by the network company, not to exceed 14 consecutive calendar days.

(3) “Net earnings” means all earnings received by an app-based driver in an earnings period, provided that the amount conforms to both of the following standards:

(A) The amount does not include gratuities, tolls, cleaning fees, airport fees, or other customer pass-throughs.

(B) The amount may include incentives or other bonuses.

(4) “Net earnings floor” means, for any earnings period, a total amount that is comprised of:

(A) For all engaged time, the sum of 120 percent of the applicable minimum wage for that engaged time.

(B) (i) The per-mile compensation for vehicle expenses set forth in this subparagraph multiplied by the total number of engaged miles.

(ii) After the effective date of this chapter and for the 2021 calendar year, the per-mile compensation for vehicle
 expenses shall be thirty cents ($0.30) per engaged mile. For calendar years after 2021, the amount per engaged mile shall be adjusted pursuant to clause (iii).

(iii) For calendar years following 2021, the per-mile compensation for vehicle expenses described in clause (ii) shall be adjusted annually to reflect any increase in inflation as measured by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics. The Treasurer’s Office shall calculate and publish the adjustments required by this subparagraph.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to require a network company to provide a particular amount of compensation to an app-based driver for any given rideshare or delivery request, as long as the app-based driver’s net earnings for each earnings period equals or exceeds that app-based driver’s net earnings floor
 for that earnings period as set forth in subdivision (b). For clarity, the net earnings floor in this section may be calculated on an average basis over the course of each earnings period.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Benefits [7454. - 7455.]

7454.

Healthcare Subsidy. (a) Consistent with the average contributions required under the Affordable Care Act (ACA), a network company shall provide a quarterly health care subsidy to qualifying app-based drivers as set forth in this section. An app-based driver that averages the following amounts of engaged time per week on a network company’s platform during a calendar quarter shall receive the following subsidies from that network company:

(1) For an average of 25 hours or more per week of engaged time in the calendar quarter, a payment greater than or equal to 100 percent of the average ACA contribution for the applicable average monthly Covered California premium for each month in the quarter.

(2) For an average of at least 15 but less than 25 hours per week of engaged time in the calendar quarter, a payment greater than or equal to 50 percent of the average ACA contribution for the applicable average monthly Covered California premium for each month in the quarter.

(b) At the end of each earnings period, a network company shall provide to each app-based driver the following information:

(1) The number of hours of engaged time the app-based driver accrued on the network company’s online-enabled application or platform during that earnings period.

(2) The number of hours of engaged time the app-based driver has accrued on the network company’s online-enabled application or platform during the current calendar quarter up to that point.

(c) Covered California may adopt or amend regulations as it deems appropriate to permit app-based drivers receiving subsidies pursuant to this section to enroll in health plans through Covered California.

(d) (1) As a condition of providing the health care subsidy set forth in subdivision (a), a network company may require an app-based driver to submit proof of current enrollment in a qualifying health plan. Proof of current enrollment may include, but is not limited to, health insurance membership or identification cards, evidence of coverage and disclosure forms from the health plan, or claim forms and other documents necessary to submit claims.

(2) An app-based driver shall have not less than 15 calendar days from the end of the calendar quarter to provide proof of enrollment as set forth in
 paragraph (1).

(3) A network company shall provide a health care subsidy due for a calendar quarter under subdivision (a) within 15 days of the end of the calendar quarter or within 15 days of the app-based driver’s submission of proof of enrollment as set forth in paragraph (1), whichever is later.

(e) For purposes of this section, a calendar quarter refers to the following four periods of time:

(1) January 1 through March 31.

(2) April 1 through June 30.

(3) July 1 through September 30.

(4) October 1 through December 31.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be
 interpreted to prevent an app-based driver from receiving a health care subsidy from more than one network company for the same calendar quarter.

(g) On or before December 31, 2020, and on or before each September 1 thereafter, Covered California shall publish the average statewide monthly premium for an individual for the following calendar year for a Covered California bronze health insurance plan.

(h) This section shall become inoperative in the event the United States or the State of California implements a universal health care system or substantially similar system that expands coverage to the recipients of subsidies under this section.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.   Conditionally inoperative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7455.

Loss and Liability Protection. No network company shall operate in California for more than 90 days unless the network company carries, provides, or otherwise makes available the following insurance coverage:

(a) For the benefit of app-based drivers, occupational accident insurance to cover medical expenses and lost income resulting from injuries suffered while the app-based driver is online with a network company’s online-enabled application or platform. Policies shall at a minimum provide the following:

(1) Coverage for medical expenses incurred, up to at least one million dollars ($1,000,000).

(2) (A) Disability
 payments equal to 66 percent of the app-based driver’s average weekly earnings from all network companies as of the date of injury, with minimum and maximum weekly payment rates to be determined in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 4453 of the Labor Code for up to the first 104 weeks following the injury.

(B) “Average weekly earnings” means the app-based driver’s total earnings from all network companies during the 28 days prior to the covered accident divided by four.

(b) For the benefit of spouses, children, or other dependents of app-based drivers, accidental death insurance for injuries suffered by an app-based driver while the app-based driver is online with the network company’s online-enabled application or platform that result in death. For purposes of this subdivision, burial expenses and death benefits shall be determined in accordance with Section 4701 and
 Section 4702 of the Labor Code.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “online” means the time when an app-based driver is utilizing a network company’s online-enabled application or platform and can receive requests for rideshare services or delivery services from the network company, or during engaged time.

(d) Occupational accident insurance or accidental death insurance under subdivisions (a) and (b) shall not be required to cover an accident that occurs while online but outside of engaged time where the injured app-based driver is in engaged time on one or more other network company platforms or where the app-based driver is engaged in personal activities. If an accident is covered by occupational accident insurance or accidental death insurance maintained by more than one network company, the insurer of the network company against whom a claim is filed is entitled to
 contribution for the pro-rata share of coverage attributable to one or more other network companies up to the coverages and limits in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(e) Any benefits provided to an app-based driver under subdivision (a) or (b) of this section shall be considered amounts payable under a worker’s compensation law or disability benefit for the purpose of determining amounts payable under any insurance provided under Article 2 (commencing with Section 11580) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code.

(f) (1) For the benefit of the public, a DNC as defined in Section 7463 shall maintain automobile liability insurance of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000) per occurrence to compensate third parties for injuries or losses proximately caused by the operation of an automobile by an app-based driver during engaged time in instances
 where the automobile is not otherwise covered by a policy that complies with subdivision (b) of Section 11580.1 of the Insurance Code.

(2) For the benefit of the public, a TNC as defined in Section 7463 shall maintain liability insurance policies as required by Article 7 (commencing with Section 5430) of Chapter 8 of Division 2 of the Public Utilities Code.

(3) For the benefit of the public, a TCP as defined in Section 7463 shall maintain liability insurance policies as required by Article 4 (commencing with Section 5391) of Chapter 8 of Division 2 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Antidiscrimination and Public Safety [7456. - 7462.]

7456.

Antidiscrimination. (a) It is an unlawful practice, unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification or public or app-based driver safety need, for a network company to refuse to contract with, terminate the contract of, or deactivate from the network company’s online-enabled application or platform, any app-based driver or prospective app-based driver based upon race, color, ancestry, national origin, religion, creed, age, physical or mental disability, sex, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, medical condition, genetic information, marital status, or military or veteran status.

(b) Claims brought pursuant to this section shall be brought solely under the procedures established by the Unruh Civil Rights Act
 (Section 51 of the Civil Code) and will be governed by its requirements and remedies.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7457.

Sexual Harassment Prevention. (a) A network company shall develop a sexual harassment policy intended to protect app-based drivers and members of the public using rideshare services or delivery services. The policy shall be available on the network company’s internet website. The policy shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:

(1) Identify behaviors that may constitute sexual harassment, including the following: unwanted sexual advances; leering, gestures, or displaying sexually suggestive objects, pictures, cartoons, or posters; derogatory comments, epithets, slurs, or jokes; graphic comments, sexually degrading words, or suggestive or obscene messages or invitations; and physical touching or assault, as well as impeding or blocking
 movements.

(2) Indicate that the network company, and in many instances the law, prohibits app-based drivers and customers utilizing rideshare services or delivery services from committing prohibited harassment.

(3) Establish a process for app-based drivers, customers, and rideshare passengers to submit complaints that ensures confidentiality to the extent possible; an impartial and timely investigation; and remedial actions and resolutions based on the information collected during the investigation process.

(4) Provide an opportunity for app-based drivers and customers utilizing rideshare services or delivery services to submit complaints electronically so complaints can be resolved quickly.

(5) Indicate that when the network company receives
 allegations of misconduct, it will conduct a fair, timely, and thorough investigation to reach reasonable conclusions based on the information collected.

(6) Make clear that neither app-based drivers nor customers utilizing rideshare services or delivery services shall be retaliated against as a result of making a good faith complaint or participating in an investigation against another app-based driver, customer, or rideshare passenger.

(b) Prior to providing rideshare services or delivery services through a network company’s online-enabled application or platform, an app-based driver shall do both of the following:

(1) Review the network company’s sexual harassment policy.

(2) Confirm to the network company, for which electronic confirmation shall
 suffice, that the app-based driver has reviewed the network company’s sexual harassment policy.

(c) Claims brought pursuant to this section shall be brought solely under the procedures established by the Unruh Civil Rights Act (Section 51 of the Civil Code) and will be governed by its requirements and remedies.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7458.

Criminal Background Checks. (a) A network company shall conduct, or have a third party conduct, an initial local and national criminal background check for each app-based driver who uses the network company’s online-enabled application or platform to provide rideshare services or delivery services. The background check shall be consistent with the standards contained in subdivision (a) of Section 5445.2 of the Public Utilities Code. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, after an app-based driver’s consent is obtained by a network company for an initial background check, no additional consent shall be required for the continual monitoring of that app-based driver’s criminal history if the network company elects to undertake such continual monitoring.

(b) A network company shall complete the initial criminal background check as required by subdivision (a) prior to permitting an app-based driver to utilize the network company’s online-enabled application or platform. The network company shall provide physical or electronic copies or summaries of the initial criminal background check to the app-based driver.

(c) An app-based driver shall not be permitted to utilize a network company’s online-enabled application or platform if one of the following applies:

(1) The driver has ever been convicted of any crime listed in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5445.2 of the Public Utilities Code, any serious felony as defined by subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code, or any hate crime as defined by Section 422.55 of the Penal Code.

(2) The driver has been convicted within the last seven years of any crime listed in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 5445.2 of the Public Utilities Code.

(d) (1) The ability of an app-based driver to utilize a network company’s online-enabled application or platform may be suspended if the network company learns the driver has been arrested for any crime listed in either of the following:

(A) Subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2), or paragraph (3), of subdivision (a) of Section 5445.2 of the Public Utilities Code.

(B) Subdivision (c) of this section.

(2) The suspension described in paragraph (1) may be lifted upon the disposition of an arrest for any crime listed
 in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2), or paragraph (3), of subdivision (a) of Section 5445.2 of the Public Utilities Code that does not result in a conviction. Such disposition includes a finding of factual innocence from any relevant charge, an acquittal at trial, an affidavit indicating the prosecuting attorney with jurisdiction over the alleged offense has declined to file a criminal complaint, or an affidavit indicating all relevant time periods described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 799) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code have expired.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to prevent a network company from imposing additional standards relating to criminal history.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 1786.12 of the Civil Code, an investigative consumer reporting agency may furnish an investigative consumer report to a network company about a person seeking to
 become an app-based driver, regardless of whether the app-based driver is to be an employee or an independent contractor of the network company.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7459.

Safety Training. (a) A network company shall require an app-based driver to complete the training described in this section prior to allowing the app-based driver to utilize the network company’s online-enabled application or platform.

(b) A network company shall provide each app-based driver safety training. The safety training required by this section shall include the following subjects:

(1) Collision avoidance and defensive driving techniques.

(2) Identification of collision-causing elements such as excessive speed, DUI, and distracted driving.

(3) Recognition and reporting of sexual assault and misconduct.

(4) For app-based drivers delivering prepared food or groceries, food safety information relevant to the delivery of food, including temperature control.

(c) The training may, at the discretion of the network company, be provided via online, video, or in-person training.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any app-based driver that has entered into a contract with a network company prior to January 1, 2021, to provide rideshare services or delivery services shall have until July 1, 2021, to complete the safety training required by this section, and may continue to provide rideshare services or delivery services through the network company’s online-enabled application or platform until that date. On and after July 1, 2021, app-based drivers
 described in this subdivision must complete the training required by this section in order to continue providing rideshare services and delivery services.

(e) Any safety product, feature, process, policy, standard, or other effort undertaken by a network company, or the provision of equipment by a network company, to further public safety is not an indicia of an employment or agency relationship with an app-based driver.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7460.

Zero Tolerance Policies. (a) A network company shall institute a “zero tolerance policy” that mandates prompt suspension of an app-based driver’s access to the network company’s online-enabled application or platform in any instance in which the network company receives a report through its online-enabled application or platform, or by any other company-approved method, from any person who reasonably suspects the app-based driver is under the influence of drugs or alcohol while providing rideshare services or delivery services.

(b) Upon receiving a report described in subdivision (a), a network company shall promptly suspend the app-based driver from the company’s online-enabled application or platform for further investigation.

(c) A network company may suspend access to the network company’s online-enabled application or platform for any app-based driver or customer found to be reporting an alleged violation of a zero tolerance policy as described in subdivision (a) where that driver or customer knows the report to be unfounded or based the report on an intent to inappropriately deny a driver access to the online-enabled application or platform.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7460.5.

A network company shall make continuously and exclusively available to law enforcement a mechanism to submit requests for information to aid in investigations related to emergency situations, exigent circumstances, and critical incidents.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7461.

App-based Driver Rest. An app-based driver shall not be logged in and driving on a network company’s online-enabled application or platform for more than a cumulative total of 12 hours in any 24-hour period, unless that driver has already logged off for an uninterrupted period of 6 hours. If an app-based driver has been logged on and driving for more than a cumulative total of 12 hours in any 24-hour period, without logging off for an uninterrupted period of 6 hours, the driver shall be prohibited from logging back into the network company’s online-enabled application or platform for an uninterrupted period of at least 6 hours.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7462.

Impersonating an App-Based Driver. Any person who fraudulently impersonates an app-based driver while providing or attempting to provide rideshare or delivery services shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for up to six months, or a fine of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both. Nothing in this subdivision precludes prosecution under any other law.

(b) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, any person who fraudulently impersonates an app-based driver while providing or attempting to provide rideshare services or delivery services in the commission or attempted commission of an offense described in Section 207, 209, 220, 261, 264.1, 286, 287, 288, or 289 of the Penal Code shall be sentenced to an
 additional term of five years.

(c) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, any person who fraudulently impersonates an app-based driver while providing or attempting to provide rideshare services or delivery services in the commission of a felony or attempted felony and in so doing personally inflicts great bodily injury to another person other than an accomplice shall be sentenced to an additional term of five years.

(d) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, any person who fraudulently impersonates an app-based driver while providing or attempting to provide rideshare services or delivery services in the commission of a felony or attempted felony and in so doing causes the death of another person other than an accomplice shall be sentenced to an additional term of 10 years.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Definitions [7463. - 7463.]

7463.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “App-based driver” means an individual who is a DNC courier, TNC driver, or TCP driver or permit holder; and for whom the conditions set forth in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 7451 are satisfied.

(b) “Average ACA contribution” means 82 percent of the dollar amount of the average monthly Covered California premium.

(c) “Average monthly Covered California premium” equals the dollar amount published pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 7454.

(d) “Covered California” means the California
 Health Benefit Exchange, codified in Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of the Government Code.

(e) “Customer” means one or more natural persons or business entities.

(f) “Delivery network company” (DNC) means a business entity that maintains an online-enabled application or platform used to facilitate delivery services within the State of California on an on-demand basis, and maintains a record of the amount of engaged time and engaged miles accumulated by DNC couriers. Deliveries are facilitated on an on-demand basis if DNC couriers are provided with the option to accept or decline each delivery request and the DNC does not require the DNC courier to accept any specific delivery request as a condition of maintaining access to the DNC’s online-enabled application or platform.

(g) “Delivery network company
 courier” (DNC courier) means an individual who provides delivery services through a DNC’s online-enabled application or platform.

(h) “Delivery services” means the fulfillment of delivery requests, meaning the pickup from any location of any item or items and the delivery of the items using a passenger vehicle, bicycle, scooter, walking, public transportation, or other similar means of transportation, to a location selected by the customer located within 50 miles of the pickup location. A delivery request may include more than one, but not more than 12, distinct orders placed by different customers. Delivery services may include the selection, collection, or purchase of items by a DNC courier provided that those tasks are done in connection with a delivery that the DNC courier has agreed to deliver. Delivery services do not include deliveries that are subject to Section 26090, as that section read on October 29, 2019.

(i) “Engaged miles” means all miles driven during engaged time in a passenger vehicle that is not owned, leased, or rented by the network company.

(j) (1) “Engaged time” means, subject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (2), the period of time, as recorded in a network company’s online-enabled application or platform, from when an app-based driver accepts a rideshare request or delivery request to when the app-based driver completes that rideshare request or delivery request.

(2) (A) Engaged time shall not include the following:

(i) Any time spent performing a rideshare service or delivery service after the request has been canceled by the customer.

(ii) Any time spent on a rideshare service or delivery service where the app-based driver abandons performance of the service prior to completion.

(B) Network companies may also exclude time if doing so is reasonably necessary to remedy or prevent fraudulent use of the network company’s online-enabled application or platform.

(k) “Local government” means a city, county, city and county, charter city, or charter county.

(l) “Network company” means a business entity that is a DNC or a TNC.

(m) “Passenger vehicle” means a passenger vehicle as defined in Section 465 of the Vehicle Code.

(n) “Qualifying health plan” means a health
 insurance plan in which the app-based driver is the subscriber, that is not sponsored by an employer, and that is not a Medicare or Medicaid plan.

(o) “Rideshare service” means the transportation of one or more persons.

(p) “Transportation network company” (TNC) has the same meaning as the definition contained in subdivision (c) of Section 5431 of the Public Utilities Code.

(q) “Transportation network company driver” (TNC driver) has the same meaning as the definition of driver contained in subdivision (a) of Section 5431 of the Public Utilities Code.

(r) “Charter-party carrier of passengers” (TCP) shall have the same meaning as the definition contained in Section 5360 of the Public Utilities Code, provided the driver is providing rideshare services
 using a passenger vehicle through a network company’s online-enabled application or platform.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Uniform Work Standards [7464. - 7464.]

7464.

(a) The performance of a single rideshare service or delivery service frequently requires an app-based driver to travel across the jurisdictional boundaries of multiple local governments. California has over 500 cities and counties, which can lead to overlapping, inconsistent, and contradictory local regulations for cross-jurisdictional services.

(b) In light of the cross-jurisdictional nature of the rideshare services and delivery services, and in addition to the other requirements and standards established by this chapter, the state hereby occupies the field in the following areas:

(1) App-based driver compensation and gratuity, except as provided in Section 7453.

(2) App-based driver scheduling, leave, health care subsidies, and any other work-related stipends, subsidies, or benefits.

(3) App-based driver licensing and insurance requirements.

(4) App-based driver rights with respect to a network company’s termination of an app-based driver’s contract.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), nothing in this section shall limit a local government’s ability to adopt local ordinances necessary to punish the commission of misdemeanor and felony crimes or to enforce local ordinances and regulations enacted prior to October 29, 2019.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Income Reporting  [7464.5. - 7464.5.]

7464.5.

(a) A network company that is acting as a third-party settlement organization shall prepare an information return for each participating payee who is an app-based driver with a California address that has a gross amount of reportable payment transactions equal to or greater than six hundred dollars ($600) during a calendar year, irrespective of the number of transactions between the third-party settlement organization and the payee. A third-party settlement organization must report these amounts to the Franchise Tax Board and furnish a copy to the payee, even if it does not have a federal reporting obligation. The information return shall identify the following:

(1) The name, address, and tax identification number of the participating
 payee.

(2) The gross amount of the reportable payment transactions with respect to the participating payee.

(b) Within 30 days following the date such an information return would be due to the Internal Revenue Service, a network company shall file a copy of any information return required by subdivision (a) with the Franchise Tax Board and shall provide a copy to the participating payee.

(c) A network company may fulfill this requirement by submitting a copy of Internal Revenue Service Form 1099-K or by submitting a form provided by the Franchise Tax Board that includes the same information as that on Cal-1099-K.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Participating payee” has the same
 meaning as provided in Section 6050W(d)(1)(A)(ii) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(2) “Reportable payment transaction” has the same meaning as provided in Section 6050W(c)(1) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(3) “Third-party settlement organization” has the same meaning as provided in Section 6050W(b)(3) of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(e) This section shall not apply in instances where the gross amount of reportable payment transactions for a participating payee in a calendar year is less than six hundred dollars ($600) or where the participating payee is not an app-based driver.

(f) This section shall apply to reportable payment transactions occurring on or after January 1, 2021.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Amendment [7465. - 7465.]

7465.

(a) After the effective date of this chapter, the Legislature may amend this chapter by a statute passed in each house of the Legislature by rollcall vote entered into the journal, seven-eighths of the membership concurring, provided that the statute is consistent with, and furthers the purpose of, this chapter. No bill seeking to amend this chapter after the effective date of this chapter may be passed or ultimately become a statute unless the bill has been printed and distributed to members, and published on the internet, in its final form, for at least 12 business days prior to its passage in either house of the Legislature.

(b) No statute enacted after October 29, 2019, but prior to the effective date of this chapter, that would constitute
 an amendment of this chapter, shall be operative after the effective date of this chapter unless the statute was passed in accordance with the requirements of subdivision (a).

(c) (1) The purposes of this chapter are described in Article 1 (commencing with Section 7448).

(2) Any statute that amends Section 7451 does not further the purposes of this chapter.

(3) Any statute that prohibits app-based drivers from performing a particular rideshare service or delivery service while allowing other individuals or entities to perform the same rideshare service or delivery service, or otherwise imposes unequal regulatory burdens upon app-based drivers based on their classification status, constitutes an amendment of this chapter and must be enacted in compliance with the procedures governing amendments
 consistent with the purposes of this chapter as set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(4) Any statute that authorizes any entity or organization to represent the interests of app-based drivers in connection with drivers’ contractual relationships with network companies, or drivers’ compensation, benefits, or working conditions, constitutes an amendment of this chapter and must be enacted in compliance with the procedures governing amendments consistent with the purposes of this chapter as set forth in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) Any statute that imposes additional misdemeanor or felony penalties in order to provide greater protection against criminal activity for app-based drivers and individuals using rideshare services or delivery services may be enacted by the Legislature by rollcall vote entered into the journal, a majority of the membership of each house concurring,
 without complying with subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Regulations [7466. - 7466.]

7466.

(a) Emergency regulations may be adopted by Covered California in order to implement and administer subdivisions (c) and (g) of Section 7454.

(b) Any emergency regulation adopted pursuant to this section shall be adopted in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and, for purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the regulation is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the emergency regulations adopted by Covered California may remain in
 effect for two years from the date of adoption.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Severability [7467. - 7467.]

7467.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the provisions of this chapter are severable. If any portion, section, subdivision, paragraph, clause, sentence, phrase, word, or application of this chapter is for any reason held to be invalid by a decision of any court of competent jurisdiction, that decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this chapter. The people of the State of California hereby declare that they would have adopted this chapter and each and every portion, section, subdivision, paragraph, clause, sentence, phrase, word, and application not declared invalid or unconstitutional without regard to whether any other portion of this chapter or application thereof would be subsequently declared invalid.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if any portion, section, subdivision, paragraph, clause, sentence, phrase, word, or application of Section 7451 of Article 2 (commencing with Section 7451), as added by the voters, is for any reason held to be invalid by a decision of any court of competent jurisdiction, that decision shall apply to the entirety of the remaining provisions of this chapter, and no provision of this chapter shall be deemed valid or given force of law.

(History: Added November 3, 2020, by initiative Proposition 22, Sec. 1.   Effective December 16, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10.7. Transportation Network Company Drivers Labor Relations Act [7470. - 7470.21.]

7470.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited as, the Transportation Network Company Drivers Labor Relations Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 335, Sec. 1.   (AB 1340)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

7470.1.

(a) It is the policy of the State of California to encourage and protect the right of transportation network company drivers to full freedom of association, self-organization, and designation of representatives of their own choosing to negotiate the compensation that they receive as well as other terms and conditions of their agreements with transportation network companies.

(b) The benefit to the state’s economy from negotiated agreements between
 transportation network company drivers and the transportation network companies, including where those agreements are multiparty, sectoral agreements, outweighs the anticompetitive effect of those agreements. It is the state’s intent that the state action antitrust exemption to the application of federal and state antitrust laws shall apply to the activities of transportation network company drivers, transportation network company driver organizations, bargaining representatives for transportation network company drivers, and transportation network companies when they are participating in negotiations and other activities as authorized or regulated by this chapter.

(c) The purposes of this chapter are to provide
 transportation network